Washington statutes.
RCW 36.88.070

Diagram only preliminary determination.

The diagram or print herein directed to be submitted to the board shall be in the nature of a preliminary determination upon the method, and estimated amounts, of assessments to be levied upon the property specially benefited by such improvement and shall in no case be construed as being binding or conclusive as to the amount of any assessments which may ultimately be levied.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.88.070. Prior: 1951 c 192 s 7.]